North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Short Title and Reservation of Power.

§ 55A-1-01.
Short title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act”.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to jurisdiction of the superior court division over proceedings under this Chapter, see

G.S. 7A-249

.

For the North Carolina Community Trust for Persons with Severe Chronic Disabilities Act, see G.S. 36A-59.10 et seq.

§ 55A-1-02.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The General Assembly has power to amend or repeal all or part of this Chapter at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this Chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§§ 55A-1-03 through 55A-1-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.